apertium-mag.mag.lexd
LEXICON NounRoot  
śailī:śailī					# style
lekhanī:lekhanī					# pen/stylus
sarthak:sarthak					# assistant
sārthak:sārthak					# assistant
saṃgaṭhan:saṃgaṭhan				# organization
sāthī:sāthī					# parthenr
hāṃth:hāṃth					# hand
sītā:sītā					# name
muddā:muddā					# name
gop:gop						# ?
danne:danne					# ?
caudharī:caudharī				# Indian title
awasar:awasar					# opportunity
kaṃṭh:kaṃṭh					# jug
ekare:ekare					# acre
bādar:bādar					# ?
baḍī:baḍī					# buddy?
phuliyā:phuliyā					# town name
dārū:dārū					# ?
juān:juān					# ?
baHādurpurī:baHādurpurī				# place name
rānī:rānī					# queen
saṃsamaraṇa:saṃsamaraṇa				# edition
saṃjay:saṃjay					# name
utsāH:utsāH					# place name
sujhāw:sujhāw					# suggestion
akṭūbar:akṭūbar					# October
ḍeuṛhī:ḍeuṛhī					# ?
paṃcaitī:paṃcaitī				# village council
gauraw:gauraw					# name
gagan:gagan					# name
kalākār:kalākār					# artist
dewarsī:dewarsī					# sage among the demigods
darjan:darjan					# iranian village
dhār:dhār					# torrent
dheyan:dheyan					# name
patnī:patnī					# name
paṃḍit:paṃḍit					# pundit
mauke:mauke					# chance
bhunesar:bhunesar				# place name (typo of bhubaneswar?)
manoj:manoj					# name
śaHar:śaHar					# city
taluk:taluk					# hereditary estate
bin:bin						# bin
baris:baris					# year
waraṣ:waraṣ					# year
baiṃk:baiṃk					# bank
lakṣmī:lakṣmī					# Hindu goddess
rūbal:rūbal					# ruble
sekhar:sekhar					# name
sardhāṃjalī:sardhāṃjalī				# tribute
samīkṣā:samīkṣā					# name (also sports medicine center)
samiti:samiti					# committee
kārykaram:kārykaram				# event
kasauṭī:kasauṭī					# test
udaghāṭan:udaghāṭan				# inauguration
awāj:awāj					# voice
salīmā:salīmā					# ?
galī:galī					# street
saṛak:saṛak					# street
gād:gād						# ?
choṭgar:choṭgar					# place name
citraṇ:citraṇ					# tv station
titakī:titakī					# butterfly
ḍar:ḍar						# fear
bhore:bhore					# ?
narena:narena					# name
narendra:narendra				# Narendra Modi, prime minister of India
modi:modi					# Narendra Modi, prime minister of India
dewaspurī:dewaspurī				# ?
baṃdhu:baṃdhu					# brother
pīṭh:pīṭh					# bench
pāraṭī:pāraṭī					# place name
noṭ:noṭ						# note
netājī:netājī					# airport in west bengal
subhaś:subhaś					# airport in west bengal
nālandā:nālandā					# village in rajgir
candra:candra					# airport in west bengal
bose:bose					# airport in west bengal
nārī:nārī					# name, place name, and movie title
sauṃse:sauṃse					# ?
Houle:Houle					# ?
Howai:Howai					# ?
rājgīr:rājgīr					# place name
śobhā:śobhā					# name
kādo:kādo					# ?
roṭī:roṭī					# Nepali flatbread
saṃdeś:saṃdeś					# message
sāṃjh:sāṃjh					# dusk
samdarśī:samdarśī				# ?
wibhāgādhayakaṣ:wibhāgādhayakaṣ			# department head
siṃgār:siṃgār					# singer?
sās:sās						# ?
akhabār:akhabār					# newspaper
āśā:āśā						# name
garām:garām					# ?
gurū:gurū					# teacher (guru)
gaṃgā:gaṃgā					# Ganges
duārī:duārī					# name
badrā:badrā					# name
dhar:dhar					# name
jhūmar:jhūmar					# chandelier
juliyā:juliyā					# Julia
becār:becār					# poor (n.)
maiḍam:maiḍam					# madam
janawarī:janawarī				# January
ūHāṃ:ūHāṃ					# ?
sale:sale					# ?
saras:saras					# ?
senā:senā					# army
saciwa:saciwa					# secretary
śiwa:śiwa					# Shiva
raṃjīt:raṃjīt					# name
korsis:korsis					# CoreSys
kuccho:kuccho					# female dog
kal:kal						# yesterday/tomorrow
choṭakī:choṭakī					# nickname
parācārya:parācārya				# name?
parwīṇ:parwīṇ					# name
śarotariya:śarotariya				# place name
warmā:warmā					# name
rameś:rameś					# name
mukām:mukām					# place/point
maHotsaw:maHotsaw				# name
sajanī:sajanī					# name
saṃbedhan:saṃbedhan				# address
Hajār:Hajār					# thousand
sunarī:sunarī					# place name
saṃsāra:saṃsāra					# sanskrit technical term meaning world, rebirty, "cyclicality of all life, matter, existence"
āwāj:āwāj					# voice
cun:cun						# election
lākh:lākh					# one hundred thousand
chappal:chappal					# chapel
parasatuti:parasatuti				# ?
śekhpurā:śekhpurā				# place name
wijay:wijay					# name (of a famous actor)
kau:kau						# ?
sanes:sanes					# senses?
sujanī:sujanī					# bihari embroirdery
janī:janī					# birth
dīyā:dīyā					# ?
tīnoṃ:tīnoṃ					# trio
taraph:taraph					# side
dhanaṃjay:dhanaṃjay				# name/movie title/actor
bhāg:bhāg					# good
baje:baje					# evening
parmeśwarī:parmeśwarī				# Hindu god
naukarī:naukarī					# job
śikṣā:śikṣā					# teacher
śikṣaka:śikṣaka					# teacher
adhikārī:adhikārī				# officer
khāṛ:khāṛ					# place name
katate:katate					# ?
kurasī:kurasī					# pedestal
kān:kān						# ear
phin:phin					# fin
nāgarik:nāgarik					# citizen
paṃkati:paṃkati					# rank, verse, line, range, string
pūjā:pūjā					# hindu ritual
Hirdā:Hirdā					# ?
pareraṇā:pareraṇā				# ?
samāroH:samāroH					# function
sukh:sukh					# happiness
dwārā:dwārā					# gate
tar:tar						# level
sadasay:sadasay					# member
saHajoga:saHajoga				# kind of yoga
raHalūṃ:raHalūṃ					# name
daśā:daśā					# ?
chātī:chātī					# chest
bhārat:bhārat					# India
enane:enane					# ?
patra:patra					# parent
patathar:patathar				# parent
parsāra:parsāra					# ?
bhīṛ:bhīṛ					# crowd
maṃjhwekar:maṃjhwekar				# name
saṃskāra:saṃskāra				# world
sāwan:sāwan					# fifth month of the nanakshahi calendar
kapaṛā:kapaṛā					# cloth
biyāH:biyāH					# name
bulknī:bulknī					# name
khūbe:khūbe					# name
pustaka:pustaka					# book
ādhā:ādhā					# half
bhijun:bhijun					# ?
alāwe:alāwe					# ?
ādhū:ādhū					# ?
arūṇ:arūṇ					# ?
miśar:miśar					# mischief
laghukakhā:laghukakhā				# ?
oHe:oHe						# ?
ūHe:ūHe						# ?
wariṣṭh:wariṣṭh					# senior
rāmnāth:rāmnāth					# name
saHayoga:saHayoga				# collaboration
nayakā:nayakā					# ?
mocha:mocha					# ?
rājnīti:rājnīti					# politics
Hāiku:Hāiku					# haiku
rāmratan:rāmratan				# movie title
bacacā:bacacā					# child
jaldī:jaldī					# ?
gelūṃ:gelūṃ					# ?
ceHrā:ceHrā					# face
śaphīk:śaphīk					# name (shafiq)
kiraṇ:kiraṇ					# name
logan:logan					# ?
kiśor:kiśor					# teen
wiśwa:wiśwa					# ?
sitab:sitab					# ?
māy:māy						# ?
bāre:bāre					# ?
pati:pati					# husband
māṭī:māṭī					# movie name?
saṃgraH:saṃgraH					# code
ma:ma						# ?
lewe:lewe					# ?
pher:pher					# ?
majur:majur					# ?
khūn:khūn					# blood
maHīnā:maHīnā					# month
ghaṛī:ghaṛī					# clock
sagro:sagro					# ?
pūrṇā:pūrṇā					# name
prophesar:prophesar				# professor
maṃdir:maṃdir					# temple
sāHeb:sāHeb					# noble/prince
sāHab:sāHab					# noble/prince
kathā:kathā					# ?
wibhāg:wibhāg					# department
butrū:butrū					# name
rājeś:rājeś					# name
dane:dane					# grain
widyālaya:widyālaya				# school
umeś:umeś					# name
gāṛī:gāṛī					# cart
radhiyā:radhiyā					# name
yogeś:yogeś					# name
goṣaṭī:goṣaṭī					# party
kārṇa:kārṇa					# reason
jal:jal						# water
āyal:āyal					# oil
tel:tel						# oil
dukh:dukh					# sorrow
duniyā:duniyā					# world
koolej:koolej					# college
kajarī:kajarī					# kajari melon
ām:ām						# mango
nagar:nagar					# place name
goṣaṭhī:goṣaṭhī					# place name
pīṛhī:pīṛhī					# generation
daur:daur					# round
diwas:diwas					# day
kalam:kalam					# pen
lokārapaṇa:lokārapaṇa				# publication
marad:marad					# ?
wīṇā:wīṇā					# name
lok:lok						# something to do with literature
kumrī:kumrī					# name
taiyo:taiyo					# ?
laikā:laikā					# ? (lyka?)
wiṣya:wiṣya					# topic
sewā:sewā					# service
samRdadh:samRdadh				# prosperity
bhaṭṭā:bhaṭṭā					# name
kitāb:kitāb					# book
jāke:jāke					# ?
meHrārū:meHrārū					# place name
maṃḍap:maṃḍap					# pavilion
bhaiyā:bhaiyā					# brother
baṛgar:baṛgar					# name
saṃgh:saṃgh					# union
wiśwawidayālaya:wiśwawidayālaya			# university
rūpaiyā:rūpaiyā					# rupee
iyā:iyā						# ?
dunno:dunno					# ? (dunno, lol)
dunnū:dunnū					# ?
dā:dā						# give?
da:da						# give?
bīc:bīc						# beach
dūdh:dūdh					# milk
wayaṃgay:wayaṃgay				# vanguard
bhāw:bhāw					# price
biāH:biāH					# ?
eHī:eHī						# ?
samajh:samajh					# understanding
mor:mor						# peacock
saṃskRti:saṃskRti				# sanskrit
kRṣṇa:kRṣṇa					# Krishna
sārathī:sārathī					# charioteer
Hāsay:Hāsay					# ?
phūl:phūl					# flower
phen:phen					# fen
candū:candū					# Chandu
parayās:parayās					# effort
sureś:sureś					# name
paHāṛ:paHāṛ					# mountain
baki:baki					# name?
deH:deH						# body
raṃg:raṃg					# color
najar:najar					# eye
goṛ:goṛ						# God
phagunī:phagunī					# name
sinHā:sinHā					# lion/brave person/sinha
niHorā:niHorā					# name
nai:nai						# ?
paisā:paisā					# ?
māṃjhī:māṃjhī					# name (mountain man)
maṃtrī:maṃtrī					# mantra
Hoke:Hoke					# ?
mokā:mokā					# mocha?
baṛ:baṛ						# size
jagaH:jagaH					# place
aśoka:aśoka					# Ashoka
sujātā:sujātā					# Sujata
māthā:māthā					# forehead
iyād:iyād					# ?
āwe:āwe						# ?
dināṃk:dināṃk					# ?
kāway:kāway					# ?
wārisalīgaṃj:wārisalīgaṃj			# ?
ḍhībrā:ḍhībrā					# place name
parathinidhi:parathinidhi			# representative
sau:sau						# sau
goṣṭhīlogoṃ:goṣṭhīlogoṃ				# person
caracā:caracā					# ?
bhāt:bhāt					# morning
diśā:diśā					# direction
dhān:dhān					# paddy
samamān:samamān					# honor
itiHās:itiHās					# history
Hamanī:Hamanī					# human?
HamanaHīṃ:HamanaHīṃ				# human?
sāmane:sāmane					# front
dharma:dharma					# dharma
kṣetra:kṣetra					# Kshetra
pās:pās						# pass?
khabar:khabar					# news
aurat:aurat					# woman
śaṃkar:śaṃkar					# name
bār:bār						# times
patā:patā					# address
paṃkaj:paṃkaj					# name
samay:samay					# time
śabda:śabda					# speech utterance (Sanksrit technical term)
āgū:āgū						# ?
sababhe:sababhe					# ?
manabh:manabh					# ?
jīw:jīw						# life
satar:satar					# seventy
sāt:sāt						# seven
pāṃc:pāṃc					# five
das:das						# ten
tīn:tīn						# three
cār:cār						# four
bīs:bīs						# twenty
rūp:rūp						# ?
bhāsā:bhāsā					# language
bhāṣā:bhāṣā					# language
bhaujī:bhaujī					# patron
kheta:kheta					# farm
jingī:jingī					# ?
saka:saka					# ?
atithi:atithi					# guest
daśaratha:daśaratha				# name
deśa:deśa					# country
Hisua:Hisuā					# city name
nawada:nawada					# place name
śarī:śarī					# sari
mithileś:mithileś				# name
yu:yu						# ?
ratnā:ratnā					# ?
sāl:sāl						# year
walā:walā					# ?
wikās:wikās					# development
māy:māy						# ?
man:man						# ?
uday:uday					# ?
Hind:Hind					# hindi
rāma:rāma					# Rama
rāt:rāt						# night
magaH:magaH					# magahi
dharatī:dharatī					# Earth
biHār:biHār					# name of a region
gīt:gīt						# song
jayarām:jayarām					# idk
samāj:samāj					# society
nawādā:nawādā					# name
siṃH:siṃH					# name
muṃH:muṃH					# mouth
Howe:Howe					# name
āyojan:āyojan					# event
laghukathā:laghukathā				# short story
kaHānī:kaHānī					# story
maṃc:maṃc					# forum
aṃk:aṃk						# digit
āṃkh:āṃkh					# eye
āg:āg						# fire
kisān:kisān					# farmer
bābū:bābū					# name
bābā:bābā					# name
kumār:kumār					# name
kājkaram:kājkaram				# name
ḍo:ḍo						# doctor
ḍo०:ḍo०					# doctor
ḍokṭar:ḍokṭar					# doctor
sāHit:sāHit					# literature
saHit:saHit					# literature
ghorā:ghorā					# horse
bail:bail					# bull
phal:phal					# fruit
magaHī:magaHī					# magahī
jantar:jantar					# instrument
jag:jag						# religious ceremony
dhan:dhan					# money
widhā:widhā					# mode
wicār:wicār					# thoughts
jug:jug						# era
bans:bans					# lineage
bansi:bansi					# flute
bacan:bacan					# word, promise
bajar:bajar					# thunderbolt
teoHār:teoHār					# festival
piās:piās					# thirst
ciuṃti:ciuṃti					# ant
subhāw:subhāw					# nature
iāri:iāri					# friendship
gāṃo:gāṃo					# village
gāṃw:gāṃw					# Dir/LR village
ṭhāṃo:ṭhāṃo					# place
murHi:murHi					# roasted rice
moṛhā:moṛhā					# sitting stool
tilHā:tilHā					# mound
cinHā:cinHā					# sign
tumHiṃ:tumHiṃ					# musical instrument
karia:karia					# black
Har:Har						# plow
phār:phār					# plowshare
karam:karam					# destiny
darad:darad					# pain
jeonār:jeonār					# feast
garHan:garHan					# eclipse
ṭhelā:ṭhelā					# pushcart
bojhā:bojhā					# load
koṛā:koṛā					# whip
basant:basant					# spring
dokān:dokān					# store
loHā:loHā					# iron
loHār:loHār					# blacksmith
sonā:sonā					# gold
sonār:sonār					# goldsmith
ḍākā:ḍākā					# robbery
nokari:nokari					# job
